Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB593.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2308. Additional points in grading civil service examinations of applicants with disabilities.(a) Additional points assessed.--Whenever an applicant with a disability successfully passes a civil service appointment examination for a public position in this Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, and establishes that the individual possesses the qualifications required by law for appointment to the public position, the individual's examination shall be marked or graded an additional five points above the mark or grade credited for the examination, and the total mark 12345678910111213141516171819 or grade obtained shall represent the final mark or grade of the individual and shall determine the individual's standing on any eligible list, certified or furnished to the appointing power.(b) Advertisement.--The director shall advertise, on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website and in all commission announcements, advertisements and examination materials that to determine standing on all certified eligibility lists, an additional five points will be applied to the final examination score obtained by an applicant with a disability in accordance with this section.(c) Qualification.--(1) In order to qualify for the additional points as provided in subsection (a), an applicant with a disability must voluntarily disclose to the commission the nature of the disability and submit any supporting documentation as required by the commission under this section.(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring an applicant with a disability to disclose the disability in violation of any Federal, State or local law.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "applicant with a disability" shall mean an applicant who discloses to the commission that the applicant has a handicap or disability as defined under section 4 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, and as required under subsection (c).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0593PN0601 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526